Massachusetts, session 194th, S2562.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department 
of correction shall establish a sick leave bank for Carlos Borges, an employee of the department. 
Any employee of the department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation 
days to the sick leave bank for use by Carlos Borges. If Carlos Borges terminates employment 
with the department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick 
leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not 
be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of 
the sick leave bank as determined by the department. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.